Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Department  of Energy, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $80,092 for oversight of ra-
dioactive waste disposal.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$31,011,546 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Energy.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,022,570 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Department of  Energy for debt service for the energy
efficiency and  sustainable technology loan program, and for the public schools grant pro-
gram.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,123,736 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the State Department of
Energy.
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the following  expenditures by the
State Department of Energy are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for loans for small scale local energy projects; and
(2) Expenditures for debt service.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 2